Illinois, session 104th, HB2606.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 235 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/235 new)7    Sec. 235. Women's Opportunity Credit. 8    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 92026, there is allowed a refundable credit against the tax 10imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an 11amount equal to 50% of the contributions made by the taxpayer 12during the taxable year to one or more qualifying pregnancy 13resource centers. 14    (b) As used in this Section, "qualifying pregnancy 15resource center" means a nonprofit organization that is exempt 16from taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue 17Code and is established for the purpose of providing free 18pregnancy tests, ultrasounds, prenatal vitamins, maternity 19clothing, baby clothes and furniture, diapers, cribs, car 20seats, housing and utility assistance, nutritional counseling, 21or other assistance to pregnant women who are carrying their 22pregnancies to term. 23    (c) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section   HB2606- 2 -LRB104 10354 HLH 20428 b1250.